tr: El ve ayak kaplama: Çıkarılabilir patik; Çıkarılabilir eldiven; Çıkarılabilir eldiven ve patik; Entegre patik; Entegre kıvrık manşet; Entegre eldiven; Entegre eldiven ve patik; Yok; Diğer
zh-TW: 手足覆蓋範圍: 可拆卸腳套; 可拆卸手套; 可拆卸手套與腳套; 連身腳套; 內建反摺袖口; 連身手套; 連身手套與腳套; 無; 其他
el: Κάλυψη χεριών και ποδιών: Αποσπώμενα παπουτσάκια; Αποσπώμενα γάντια; Αποσπώμενα γάντια και παπουτσάκια; Ενσωματωμένα παπουτσάκια; Ενσωματωμένες αναδιπλούμενες μανσέτες; Ενσωματωμένα γάντια; Ενσωματωμένα γάντια και παπουτσάκια; Κανένα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Покритие за ръце и крака: Свалящи се буйки; Свалящи се ръкавички; Свалящи се ръкавички и буйки; Вградени буйки; Вградени обръщащи се маншети; Вградени ръкавички; Вградени ръкавички и буйки; Няма; Други
ru: Покрытие рук и ног: Съемные пинетки; Съемные рукавички; Съемные рукавички и пинетки; Вшитые пинетки; Вшитые отворачивающиеся манжеты; Вшитые рукавички; Вшитые рукавички и пинетки; Нет; Другое
it: Copertura per mani e piedi: Scarpine staccabili; Muffole staccabili; Muffole e scarpine staccabili; Scarpine integrate; Risvolti integrati; Muffole integrate; Muffole e scarpine integrate; Nessuna; Altro
pl: Zakrycie dłoni i stóp: Odpinane buciki; Odpinane rękawiczki; Odpinane rękawiczki i buciki; Zintegrowane buciki; Zintegrowane wywijane mankiety; Zintegrowane rękawiczki; Zintegrowane rękawiczki i buciki; Brak; Inne
sl-SI: Pokritost rok in nog: Snemljivi čeveljci; Snemljive rokavičke; Snemljive rokavičke in čeveljci; Vgrajeni čeveljci; Vgrajeni prepogljivi robovi; Vgrajene rokavičke; Vgrajene rokavičke in čeveljci; Brez; Drugo
nb: Hånd- og fotdekning: Avtagbare fotposer; Avtagbare votter; Avtagbare votter og fotposer; Integrerte fotposer; Integrerte nedbrettbare mansjetter; Integrerte votter; Integrerte votter og fotposer; Ingen; Annet
pt-BR: Mãos e pés cobertura: Pantufas removíveis; Luvas removíveis; Luvas e pantufas removíveis; Pantufas integradas; Punhos dobráveis integrados; Luvas integradas; Luvas e pantufas integradas; Nenhuma; Outra
de: Hand- und Fußabdeckung: Abnehmbare Füßlinge; Abnehmbare Fäustlinge; Abnehmbare Fäustlinge und Füßlinge; Integrierte Füßlinge; Integrierte Umschlagbündchen; Integrierte Fäustlinge; Integrierte Fäustlinge und Füßlinge; Keine; Sonstige
pt-PT: Cobertura para mãos e pés: Botinhas amovíveis; Luvas amovíveis; Luvas e botinhas amovíveis; Botinhas integradas; Punhos dobráveis integrados; Luvas integradas; Luvas e botinhas integradas; Nenhuma; Outro
nl: Hand- en voetbedekking: Afneembare slofjes; Afneembare wantjes; Afneembare wantjes en slofjes; Geïntegreerde slofjes; Geïntegreerde omslagboordjes; Geïntegreerde wantjes; Geïntegreerde wantjes en slofjes; Geen; Overig
ja: 手足カバー: 着脱式ブーティ; 着脱式ミトン; 着脱式ミトンとブーティ; 統合型ブーティ; 統合型折り返しカフス; 統合型ミトン; 統合型ミトンとブーティ; なし; その他
hu: Kéz- és lábfedés: Levehető kocsicipő; Levehető kesztyű; Levehető kesztyű és kocsicipő; Beépített kocsicipő; Beépített, visszahajtható mandzsetta; Beépített kesztyű; Beépített kesztyű és kocsicipő; Nincs; Egyéb
sk-SK: Pokrytie rúk a nôh: Odnímateľné capačky; Odnímateľné rukavičky; Odnímateľné rukavičky a capačky; Integrované capačky; Integrované prekladacie manžety; Integrované rukavičky; Integrované rukavičky a capačky; Žiadne; Iné
sv: Hand- och fotskydd: Avtagbara tossor; Avtagbara vantar; Avtagbara vantar och tossor; Inbyggda tossor; Inbyggda övervikningsbara muddar; Inbyggda vantar; Inbyggda vantar och tossor; Ingen; Övrigt
lt-LT: Rankų ir kojų padengimas: Nuimami batukai; Nuimamos pirštinės; Nuimamos pirštinės ir batukai; Integruoti batukai; Integruoti atlenkiami rankogaliai; Integruotos pirštinės; Integruotos pirštinės ir batukai; Nėra; Kita
da: Hånd- og foddækning: Aftagelige futter; Aftagelige luffer; Aftagelige luffer og futter; Integrerede futter; Integrerede ombukningsmanchetter; Integrerede luffer; Integrerede luffer og futter; Ingen; Andet
en: Hand and foot coverage: Detachable booties; Detachable mittens; Detachable mittens and booties; Integrated booties; Integrated fold-over cuffs; Integrated mittens; Integrated mittens and booties; None; Other
ko: 손과 발 보호: 탈착식 부티; 탈착식 벙어리장갑; 탈착식 벙어리장갑 및 부티; 일체형 부티; 일체형 접이식 커프; 일체형 벙어리장갑; 일체형 벙어리장갑 및 부티; 없음; 기타
ro-RO: Acoperire pentru mâini și picioare: Botoșei detașabili; Mănuși detașabile; Mănuși și botoșei detașabili; Botoșei integrați; Manșete pliabile integrate; Mănuși integrate; Mănuși și botoșei integrați; Fără; Altele
zh-CN: 手与脚的覆盖设计: 可拆卸脚套; 可拆卸手套; 可拆卸手套和脚套; 一体式脚套; 一体式翻折袖口; 一体式手套; 一体式手套和脚套; 无; 其他
vi: Che phủ tay và chân: Giày vải tháo rời; Bao tay tháo rời; Bao tay và giày vải tháo rời; Giày vải liền; Cổ tay/chân gập liền; Bao tay liền; Bao tay và giày vải liền; Không có; Khác
th: การปกคลุมมือและเท้า: รองเท้าบูทถอดได้; ถุงมือแบบสวมถอดได้; ถุงมือแบบสวมและรองเท้าบูทถอดได้; รองเท้าบูทในตัว; ปลายแขนพับทบในตัว; ถุงมือแบบสวมในตัว; ถุงมือแบบสวมและรองเท้าบูทในตัว; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
fi: Käsien ja jalkojen suojukset: Irrotettavat tossut; Irrotettavat tumput; Irrotettavat tumput ja tossut; Kiinteät tossut; Kiinteät käännettävät suut; Kiinteät tumput; Kiinteät tumput ja tossut; Ei mitään; Muu
es: Cobertura para manos y pies: Patucos desmontables; Manoplas desmontables; Manoplas y patucos desmontables; Patucos integrados; Puños plegables integrados; Manoplas integradas; Manoplas y patucos integrados; Ninguna; Otra
fr: Couverture des mains et des pieds: Chaussons détachables; Mitaines détachables; Mitaines et chaussons détachables; Chaussons intégrés; Revers rabattables intégrés; Mitaines intégrées; Mitaines et chaussons intégrés; Aucune; Autre
hr-HR: Pokrivanje ruku i stopala: Odvojive papučice; Odvojive rukavice; Odvojive rukavice i papučice; Integrirane papučice; Integrirani preklopni rubovi; Integrirane rukavice; Integrirane rukavice i papučice; Nema; Ostalo
cs: Pokrytí rukou a nohou: Odnímatelné botičky; Odnímatelné rukavičky; Odnímatelné rukavičky a botičky; Integrované botičky; Integrované ohrnovací manžety; Integrované rukavičky; Integrované rukavičky a botičky; Žádné; Jiné